Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5036HV (1) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2339 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âAdmissions Reform Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 3. Make rules for admission to and for the government of 5 said institutions, not inconsistent with law. The rules shall 6 require the institutions of higher learning under its control 7 to accept the classic learning test, developed by classic 8 learning initiatives, into the regent admission index as an 9 additional standardized test option, in addition to the college 10 readiness assessment administered by ACT, inc., and the college 11 readiness assessment administered by the college board, for 12 purposes of calculating the regent admission index score prior 13 to the beginning of the 2026-2027 academic year. 14 Sec. 3. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. By December 31, 2026, develop and 17 adopt a policy ensuring that only merit and the likelihood of 18 employment in Iowa after graduation are considered in admission 19 determination for students who do not qualify under the regent 20 admission index. 21